Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1114.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 28 heading of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:CHAPTER 28RESTRUCTURING OF ELECTRIC UTILITY INDUSTRYAND LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERSSection 2. Chapter 28 of Title 66 is amended by adding a subchapter heading immediately preceding section 2801 to read:SUBCHAPTER ARESTRUCTURING OF ELECTRIC UTILITY INDUSTRYSection 3. Sections 2801, 2802(12), (13), (14) and (15), 2803, 2804(4), (10) and (16)(i), 2805(b)(1)(i), 2806(a), (c) and (g), 2807(b), 2808(b), (c)(1) and (5) and (e) introductory 123456789101112131415161718 paragraph, 2809(a), (b), (c) and (d), 2810(h) and (j) and 2812(a)(2) introductory paragraph, (b)(5)(ii), (f) and (g) of Title 66 are amended to read:§ 2801. Short title of [chapter] subchapter.This [chapter] subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Electricity Generation Customer Choice and Competition Act.§ 2802. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(12) The purpose of this [chapter] subchapter is to modify existing legislation and regulations and to establish standards and procedures in order to create direct access by retail customers to the competitive market for the generation of electricity while maintaining the safety and reliability of the electric system for all parties. Reliable electric service is of the utmost importance to the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth. Electric industry restructuring should ensure the reliability of the interconnected electric system by maintaining the efficiency of the transmission and distribution system.(13) Under current law and regulation there exists some competition in the wholesale market for the generation of electricity, but the generation, transmission, distribution and retail sale of electricity is provided generally by public utilities under bundled rates regulated by the commission. The procedures established under this [chapter] subchapter provide for a fair and orderly transition from the current regulated structure to a structure under which retail customers will have direct access to a competitive market for the generation and sale or purchase of electricity.20250SB1114PN1358 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (14) This [chapter] subchapter requires electric utilities to unbundle their rates and services and to provide open access over their transmission and distribution systems to allow competitive suppliers to generate and sell electricity directly to consumers in this Commonwealth. The generation of electricity will no longer be regulated as a public utility function except as otherwise provided for in this chapter. Electric generation suppliers will be required to obtain licenses, demonstrate financial responsibility and comply with such other requirements concerning service as the commission deems necessary for the protection of the public.(15) In establishing the standards for the transition to and creation of a competitive electric market, heretofore, public utilities generally have had an obligation to serve customers within their defined service territories; consistent with that obligation, have undertaken long-term investments in generation, transmission and distribution facilities in order to meet the needs of their customers; and have entered into long-term power supply agreements as required by Federal law. In many instances, these investments and agreements have created costs which may not be recoverable in a competitive market. The commission is empowered under this [chapter] subchapter to determine the level of transition or stranded costs for each electric utility and to provide a mechanism, the competitive transition charge, for recovery of an appropriate amount of such costs in accordance with the standards established in this chapter.* * *§ 2803. Definitions.20250SB1114PN1358 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following words and phrases when used in this [chapter] subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggregator" or "market aggregator." An entity, licensed by the commission, that purchases electric energy and takes title to electric energy as an intermediary for sale to retail customers."Bilateral contract." An agreement, as approved by the commission, reached by two parties, each acting in its own independent self-interest, as a result of negotiations free of undue influence, duress or favoritism, in which the electric energy supplier agrees to sell and the electric distribution company agrees to buy a quantity of electric energy at a specified price for a specified period of time under terms agreed to by both parties, and which follows a standard industry template widely accepted in the industry or variations thereto accepted by the parties. Standard industry templates may include the EEI Master Agreement for physical energy purchases and sales and the ISDA Master Agreement for financial energy purchases and sales."Broker" or "marketer." An entity, licensed by the commission, that acts as an agent or intermediary in the sale and purchase of electric energy but that does not take title to electric energy."Competitive transition charge." A nonbypassable charge applied to the bill of every customer accessing the transmission or distribution network which (charge) is designed to recover an electric utility's transition or stranded costs as determined by the commission under sections 2804 (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry) and 2808 (relating to 20250SB1114PN1358 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 competitive transition charge)."Consumer." A retail electric customer."Customer." A retail electric customer."Default service provider." An electric distribution company within its certified service territory or an alternative supplier approved by the commission that provides generation service to retail electric customers who:(1) contract for electric power, including energy and capacity, and the chosen electric generation supplier does not supply the service; or(2) do not choose an alternative electric generation supplier."Direct access." The right of electric generation suppliers and end-use customers to utilize and interconnect with the electric transmission and distribution system on a nondiscriminatory basis at rates, terms and conditions of service comparable to the transmission and distribution companies' own use of the system to transport electricity from any generator of electricity to any end-use customer."Electric distribution company." The public utility providing facilities for the jurisdictional transmission and distribution of electricity to retail customers, except building or facility owners/operators that manage the internal distribution system serving such building or facility and that supply electric power and other related electric power services to occupants of the building or facility."Electric generation supplier" or "electricity supplier." A person or corporation, including municipal corporations which choose to provide service outside their municipal limits except to the extent provided prior to the effective date of this 20250SB1114PN1358 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [chapter] subchapter, brokers and marketers, aggregators or any other entities, that sells to end-use customers electricity or related services utilizing the jurisdictional transmission or distribution facilities of an electric distribution company or that purchases, brokers, arranges or markets electricity or related services for sale to end-use customers utilizing the jurisdictional transmission and distribution facilities of an electric distribution company. The term excludes building or facility owner/operators that manage the internal distribution system serving such building or facility and that supply electric power and other related power services to occupants of the building or facility. The term excludes electric cooperative corporations except as provided in 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 (relating to generation choice for customers of electric cooperatives)."End-use customer." A retail electric customer."Reliability." Includes adequacy and security. As used in this definition, "adequacy" means the provision of sufficient generation, transmission and distribution capacity so as to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements of consumers, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled outages of system facilities; and "security" means designing, maintaining and operating a system so that it can handle emergencies safely while continuing to operate."Renewable resource." Includes technologies such as solar photovoltaic energy, solar thermal energy, wind power, low-head hydropower, geothermal energy, landfill and mine-based methane gas, energy from waste and sustainable biomass energy."Retail customer." A retail electric customer."Retail electric customer." A direct purchaser of electric power. The term excludes an occupant of a building or facility 20250SB1114PN1358 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 where the owners/operators manage the internal distribution system serving such building or facility and supply electric power and other related power services to occupants of the building or facility; where such owners/operators are direct purchasers of electric power; and where the occupants are not direct purchasers."Transition or stranded costs." An electric utility's known and measurable net electric generation-related costs, determined on a net present value basis over the life of the asset or liability as part of its restructuring plan, which traditionally would be recoverable under a regulated environment but which may not be recoverable in a competitive electric generation market and which the commission determines will remain following mitigation by the electric utility. This term includes:(1) Regulatory assets and other deferred charges typically recoverable under current regulatory practice, the unfunded portion of the utility's projected nuclear generating plant decommissioning costs and cost obligations under contracts with nonutility generating projects which have received a commission order, the recoverability of which shall be determined under section 2808(c)(1) (relating to competitive transition charge).(2) Prudently incurred costs related to cancellation, buyout, buydown or renegotiation of nonutility generating projects consistent with section 527 (relating to cogeneration rules and regulations), the recoverability of which shall be determined pursuant to section 2808(c)(2).(3) The following costs, the recoverability of which shall be determined pursuant to section 2808(c)(3):(i) Net plant investments and costs attributable to 20250SB1114PN1358 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the utility's existing generation plants and facilities.(ii) The utility's disposal of spent nuclear fuel.(iii) The utility's long-term purchase power commitments other than the costs defined in paragraphs (1) and (2).(iv) Retirement costs attributable to the utility's existing generating plants other than the costs defined in paragraph (1).(v) Other transition costs of the utility, including costs of employee severance, retraining, early retirement, outplacement and related expenses, at reasonable levels, for employees who are affected by changes that occur as a result of the restructuring of the electric industry occasioned by this [chapter] subchapter.The term includes any costs attributable to physical plants no longer used and useful because of the transition to retail competition. The term excludes any amounts previously disallowed by the commission as imprudently incurred. To the extent that the recoverability of amounts that are sought to be included as transition or stranded costs are subject to appellate review as of the time of the commission determination, any determination to include such costs shall be reversed to the extent required by the results of that appellate review."Transmission and distribution costs." All costs directly or indirectly incurred to provide transmission and distribution services to retail electric customers. This includes the return of and return on facilities and other capital investments necessary to provide transmission and distribution services and associated operating expenses, including applicable taxes.20250SB1114PN1358 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Universal service and energy conservation." Policies, protections and services that help low-income customers to maintain electric service. The term includes customer assistance programs, termination of service protection and policies and services that help low-income customers to reduce or manage energy consumption in a cost-effective manner, such as the low-income usage reduction programs, application of renewable resources and consumer education.§ 2804. Standards for restructuring of electric industry.The following interdependent standards shall govern the commission's assessment and approval of each public utility's restructuring plan, oversight of the transition process and regulation of the restructured electric utility industry:* * *(4) The following caps on electric utility rates shall apply:(i) For a period of 54 months from the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter or until an electric distribution utility is no longer recovering its transition or stranded costs through a competitive transition charge or intangible transition charge and all the customers of an electric distribution utility can choose an alternative provider of electric generation, whichever is shorter:(A) the total charges of an electric distribution utility for service to any customer who purchases generation from that utility shall not exceed the total charges that have been approved by the commission for such service as of the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter; and20250SB1114PN1358 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) for customers who purchase generation from a supplier other than the electric distribution utility, the charges of the utility for non-generation services that are regulated as of the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, exclusive of the competitive transition charge and intangible transition charge, shall not exceed the non-generation charges that have been approved by the commission for such service as of the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter.(ii) In addition to the rate cap set forth in subparagraph (i), for a period of nine years from the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter or until an electric distribution utility is no longer recovering its transition or stranded costs through a competitive transition charge or intangible transition charge and all customers of an electric distribution utility can choose an alternative provider of electric generation, whichever is shorter, the generation component of a utility's charges to customers who purchase generation from the utility, including the competitive transition charge and intangible transition charge, shall not exceed the generation component charged to the customers that has been approved by the commission for such service as of the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter.(iii) An electric distribution utility may seek, and the commission may approve, an exception to the limitations set forth in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) only in any of the following circumstances:(A) The electric distribution utility meets the 20250SB1114PN1358 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements for extraordinary rate relief under section 1308(e) (relating to voluntary changes in rates).(B) Either the electric distribution utility is required to begin payment under contracts with nonutility generation projects that have received commission orders, has been unable to mitigate such costs, such costs are not recoverable in a competitive generation market and such costs were not previously covered in the competitive transition charge or intangible transition charge, or the utility prudently incurs costs related to cancellation, buyout, buydown or renegotiation of nonutility generating project obligations of the utility consistent with section 527 (relating to cogeneration rules and regulations) and such costs were not previously covered in the competitive transition charge or intangible transition charge. Costs related to cancellation, buyout, buydown or renegotiation shall be recovered from ratepayers over a period not to exceed three years, unless the commission determines within its discretion to require a longer recovery period due to the magnitude of such costs, but shall be accounted for by the utility on a levelized basis over the total period in which the generation portion of the utility's rates are capped.(C) The electric distribution utility is subject to significant increases in the rates of Federal or State taxes or other significant changes in law or 20250SB1114PN1358 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations that would not allow the utility to earn a fair rate of return.(D) The electric distribution utility is subject to significant increases in the unit rate of fuel for utility generation or the price of purchased power that are outside of the control of the utility and that would not allow the utility to earn a fair rate of return.(E) The electric distribution utility is directed by the commission or an independent system operator or its functional equivalent to make expenditures to repair or upgrade its transmission or distribution system.(F) The electric distribution utility seeks to increase its allowance for nuclear decommissioning costs to reflect new information not available at the time the utility's existing rates were determined, and such costs are not recoverable in the competitive generation market and are not covered in the competitive transition charge or intangible transition charge, and such costs would not allow the utility to earn a fair rate of return.(G) As permitted by paragraph (16).(iv) Consistent with the requirements of due process, the commission may expedite proceedings that invoke the provisions of subparagraph (iii).(v) If an electric distribution utility rolls its energy cost rate into base rates at a combined level that does not exceed its combined level of such rates which have been approved by the commission as of the effective 20250SB1114PN1358 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date of this [chapter] subchapter, the utility shall not be required to reduce its capped rates below the capped level upon the complaint of any party if the commission determines that any excess earnings achieved under the cap are being utilized to mitigate transition or stranded costs for the benefit of ratepayers or to offset other known and measurable cost increases that would be recoverable under traditional ratemaking but are not included within the capped rates.(vi) This paragraph shall not apply to new services offered for the first time after the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter.* * *(10) The commission shall establish rates for jurisdictional transmission and distribution services and shall continue to regulate distribution services for new and existing customers in accordance with this [chapter] subchapter and Chapter 13 (relating to rates and rate making).* * *(16) The following shall apply:(i) The commission shall issue regulations that permit the electric distribution company to recover any change in its State tax liability under sections 2806(h), 2809(c) (relating to requirements for electric generation suppliers) and 2810 (relating to revenue-neutral reconciliation) or in its liability under 52 Pa. Code §§ 69.51 through 69.56 (relating to inclusion of State taxes and gross receipts taxes in base rates) to the extent that the resulting rate does not exceed the rate cap 20250SB1114PN1358 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established in this section except as provided in this [chapter] subchapter.* * *§ 2805. Regionalism and reciprocity.* * *(b) Electric cooperatives, municipalities and other electric generation suppliers.--(1) In order to make the benefits of competition in the generation and sale of electricity as widely available as possible to retail customers and to provide open, fair and nondiscriminatory access to all electric generation suppliers:(i) Consistent with 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 (relating to generation choice for customers of electric cooperatives), no electric cooperative or municipality which distributes electricity to end-use customers may utilize the transmission or distribution system of an electric utility regulated by the commission for the purpose of supplying electricity to an end-use customer unless the electric cooperative or municipality provides open and nondiscriminatory access and allows other electric generation suppliers to utilize its facilities, including any facilities it is entitled to provide to third parties pursuant to contract, to make sales to the end-use customers it serves. A borough may prohibit electric generation suppliers from serving end-use customers within its borough limits; however, such a borough shall be prohibited from providing generation service to end-use customers outside of its borough limits which it did not serve prior to the effective date 20250SB1114PN1358 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this [chapter] subchapter.* * *§ 2806. Implementation, pilot programs and performance-based rates.(a) General rule.--The generation of electricity shall no longer be regulated as a public utility service or function except as otherwise provided for in this [chapter] subchapter at the conclusion of a transition and phase-in period beginning on the effective date of this chapter and ending, consistent with the commission's discretion under this section, January 1, 2001. As of January 1, 2001, consistent with the commission's discretion under this section, all customers of electric distribution companies in this Commonwealth shall have the opportunity to purchase electricity from their choice of electric generation suppliers. The ultimate choice of the electric generation supplier is to rest with the consumer.* * *(c) Additional time.--(1) The commission may determine that an additional six-month transition period is necessary prior to the January 1, 1999, implementation date. A determination under this subsection must be made at least 45 days in advance of the scheduled date for implementation and must be based on one or more of the following considerations:(i) Implementation would materially affect the reliability of the electric system.(ii) Federal approvals necessary for the implementation of the provisions of this [chapter] subchapter have not been granted.(iii) Communications and information systems 20250SB1114PN1358 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary for the implementation of retail access have not been installed for reasons beyond the utility's control, as measured by appropriate industry standards.(iv) Pennsylvania generators would be disadvantaged due to lack of regional reciprocity with respect to direct access.(v) The interests of Pennsylvania consumers and the competitive position of Pennsylvania business and industry would be materially affected.(vi) Such other consideration as would materially affect the orderly implementation of the legislative purpose of this [chapter] subchapter under section 2802(12) through (21) (relating to declaration of policy).(2) Consistent with the considerations listed in paragraph (1), the commission may determine that an additional six-month transition period is necessary. This determination must be made by the commission by May 15, 1999.* * *(g) Retail access pilot programs.--As of the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, the commission has authority to order electric utilities to submit proposals for retail access pilot programs to begin April 1, 1997. The commission shall provide guidelines for retail access pilot programs by order.(1) In order to determine whether all customers classes can benefit from competitive markets, utilities shall tailor proposed retail access pilot programs to accommodate the specific geographic, demographic and socioeconomic characteristics of their customer base. Retail access pilot programs must include an equal opportunity for the broadest 20250SB1114PN1358 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practical direct access by all customer classes to electric generation suppliers.(2) The minimum period of time for a retail access pilot program shall be one year and shall include an evaluation process as directed by the commission.(3) In order to ensure the safety and reliability of the generation of electricity in this Commonwealth, participation in the retail access pilot programs shall be limited to electricity suppliers subject to commission licensure or certification.(i) Each participating electricity supplier shall do all of the following:(A) Certify to the commission that it will pay and in subsequent years has paid the full amount of taxes imposed by Articles II and XI of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, and any tax imposed by this [chapter] subchapter.(B) Provide the commission with the address of the participant's principal office in this Commonwealth or the address of the participant's registered agent in this Commonwealth, the latter being the address at which the participant may be served process.(C) Agree that it shall be subject to all taxes imposed by the Tax Reform Code of 1971 and any tax imposed by this [chapter] subchapter.(ii) Failure of an electricity supplier to pay a tax referred to in subparagraph (i) or to otherwise comply with the provisions of this paragraph shall be cause for 20250SB1114PN1358 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the commission to revoke the license of the electricity supplier.(iii) If an electricity supplier, other than an electric distribution company, does not pay the tax imposed upon gross receipts under section 1101 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or this [chapter] subchapter, the electric distribution company to whose retail customer the electricity supplier provided generation service shall remit the unpaid tax, as a tax on the use of electricity in this Commonwealth, to the Department of Revenue and may collect or seek reimbursement of the tax so paid from the electricity provider or any other appropriate party that used the electricity in this Commonwealth. The department shall collect and enforce the use tax herein provided under section 1102 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. Failure of the electric distribution company to pay the amount within 30 days after notice provided by the department shall cause interest to be imposed on the electric distribution company in accordance with Article XI of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. Interest shall be calculated from the 31st day after the department gives the notice required in this subparagraph. An electric distribution company or other appropriate person may challenge the imposition of the tax and interest by filing a petition with the department not later than 30 days after the date on which the tax became due.(4) The percentage of utility load committed to a retail access pilot program must be approximately 5% of utility's peak load for each customer class. Waivers of this condition 20250SB1114PN1358 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be considered by the commission for economic development purposes or special circumstances.* * *§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(b) Procedures for review by the commission.--There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the electric distribution company has the ability to receive energy at all points on its system sufficient to meet the needs of all electric generation suppliers' customers on its system. The electric distribution company shall not have an obligation to install nonstandard facilities, either as to type or location, for the purpose of receiving energy from the energy supplier unless the energy supplier or its customer pays the full cost of these facilities. Nothing in this [chapter] subchapter shall prevent the electric distribution company from upgrading its system to meet changing customer requirements consistent with the requirements of section 1501 (relating to character of service and facilities), and the commission may establish incentive programs to encourage such system upgrades. Disputes concerning facilities shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the commission and may be initiated by the filing of a complaint under section 701 (relating to complaints) by the electric generation supplier or the customer.* * *§ 2808. Competitive transition charge.* * *(b) Period for collecting competitive transition charge.--The competitive transition charge shall be included on bills to customers for a period not to exceed nine years from the 20250SB1114PN1358 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this [chapter] subchapter unless an alternative payment methodology is mutually agreed upon by the customer and the utility or unless the commission in its discretion and for good cause shown orders an alternative payment period. In establishing the length of the period for collection of the competitive transition charge, the commission shall consider the effect on the ability of the Commonwealth to compete in attracting industry and jobs, on the financial health of electric utilities and other relevant factors.(c) Determination of competitive transition charge.--In determining the level of transition or stranded costs that an electric utility may recover through the competitive transition charge, the commission shall apply the following principles:(1) The commission shall allow recovery of regulatory assets and other deferred charges typically recoverable under current regulatory practice, the unfunded portion of the utility's projected nuclear generating plant decommissioning costs and cost obligations under contracts with nonutility generating projects that have received a commission order. Nothing in this [chapter] subchapter shall be construed as requiring an electric utility or a nonutility generating project to enter into an arrangement to buy down, buy out and terminate or otherwise restructure a contract or as authorizing the commission to require a utility to pursue such an arrangement with a nonutility generating project.* * *(5) Of equal importance to the mitigation efforts under paragraph (4), the commission shall consider efforts undertaken over time, prior to the enactment of this [chapter] subchapter, to reduce or moderate customer rate 20250SB1114PN1358 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 levels while maintaining safe and efficient operations.* * *(e) Use of transition bonds.--After the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, a utility may apply to the commission for a qualified rate order under section 2812 for some or all of its transition or stranded costs.* * *§ 2809. Requirements for electric generation suppliers.(a) License requirement.--No person or corporation, including municipal corporations which choose to provide service outside their municipal limits except to the extent provided prior to the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, brokers and marketers, aggregators and other entities, shall engage in the business of an electric generation supplier in this Commonwealth unless the person or corporation holds a license issued by the commission. Consistent with 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 (relating to generation choice for customers of electric cooperatives), electric cooperative corporations must possess a certificate for service to supply generation services beyond their territorial limits.(b) License application and issuance.--An application for an electric generation supplier license must be made to the commission in writing, be verified by oath or affirmation and be in such form and contain such information as the commission may by its regulations require. A license shall be issued to any qualified applicant, authorizing the whole or any part of the service covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing and able to perform properly the service proposed and to conform to the provisions of this title and the lawful orders and regulations of the commission under 20250SB1114PN1358 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this title, including the commission's regulations regarding standards and billing practices, and that the proposed service, to the extent authorized by the license, will be consistent with the public interest and the policy declared in this [chapter] subchapter; otherwise, such application shall be denied.(c) Financial responsibility.--(1) In order to ensure the safety and reliability of the generation of electricity in this Commonwealth, no energy supplier license shall be issued or remain in force unless the holder complies with all of the following:(i) Furnishes a bond or other security approved by the commission in form and amount to ensure the financial responsibility of the electric generation supplier and the supply of electricity at retail in accordance with contracts, agreements or arrangements.(ii) Certifies to the commission that it will pay and in subsequent years has paid the full amount of taxes imposed by Articles II and XI of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, and any tax imposed by this [chapter] subchapter.(iii) Provides the commission with the address of the participant's principal office in this Commonwealth or the address of the participant's registered agent in this Commonwealth, the latter being the address at which the participant may be served process.(iv) Agrees that it shall be subject to all taxes imposed by the Tax Reform Code of 1971 and any tax imposed by this chapter.Failure of an electricity supplier to pay a tax referred to in this paragraph or to otherwise comply with the provisions 20250SB1114PN1358 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this paragraph shall be cause for the commission to revoke the license of the electricity supplier.(2) If an electricity supplier other than an electric distribution company does not pay the tax imposed upon gross receipts under section 1101 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 or this [chapter] subchapter, the electric distribution company to whose retail customer the electricity supplier provided generation service shall remit the unpaid tax, as a tax on the use of electricity in this Commonwealth, to the Department of Revenue and may collect or seek reimbursement of the tax so paid from the electricity provider or any other appropriate party that used the electricity in this Commonwealth. The department shall collect and enforce the use tax herein provided under section 1102 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. Failure of the electric distribution company to pay the amount within 30 days after notice provided by the department shall cause interest to be imposed on the electric distribution company in accordance with Article XI of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. Interest shall be calculated from the 31st day after the department gives the notice required in this paragraph. An electric distribution company or other appropriate person may challenge the imposition of the tax and interest by filing a petition with the department not later than 30 days after the date on which the tax became due.(d) Transferability of licenses.--No license issued under this [chapter] subchapter may be transferred without prior commission approval.* * *§ 2810. Revenue-neutral reconciliation.20250SB1114PN1358 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(h) Procedure, enforcement and penalties.--Parts III, IV, VI and VII of Article IV and Article XXX of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 shall apply to this section insofar as they are consistent with this section and applicable to the tax imposed under subsection (b). Notwithstanding the provisions of section 403(d) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971, if the officers of any corporation subject to tax under this [chapter] subchapter neglect or refuse to make a report as required in this [chapter] subchapter or knowingly make a false report, the department shall add to the tax determined to be due a penalty of 5% of the amount of tax due for each month or fraction of a month until the penalty has reached 25% and thereafter a penalty of 1% of the amount of tax due for each month or fraction of a month. Penalties added to the tax shall not bear interest.* * *(j) Sales of electric energy.--Retail sales of electric generation, transmission, distribution or supply of electric energy, dispatching services, customer services, competitive transition charges, intangible transition charges and universal service and energy conservation charges and such other retail sales in this Commonwealth the receipts of which, if bundled, would have been deemed to be sales of electric energy prior to the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter shall be deemed sales of electric energy for purposes of section 1101 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971. The phrases "doing business in this Commonwealth" and "engaged in electric light and power business, waterpower business and hydro-electric business in this Commonwealth," as such terms are used in section 1101(b) of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 and in this chapter, shall be construed 20250SB1114PN1358 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to include the direct or indirect engaging in, transacting or conducting of activity in this Commonwealth for the purpose of establishing or maintaining a market for the sales of electric energy and include obtaining a license or certification from the commission to supply electric energy. Retail sales of generation shall be deemed to occur at the meter of the retail consumer.* * *§ 2812. Approval of transition bonds.(a) Qualified rate orders.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission is authorized to issue qualified rate orders in accordance with the provisions of this subsection to facilitate the recovery or financing of qualified transition expenses of an electric utility or assignee.* * *(2) After the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, an electric utility may file an application for a qualified rate order pursuant to the following procedures:* * *(b) Expedited review procedures.--* * *(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on such conditions as the commission may approve, all or portions of the interest of an electric utility in intangible transition property may be assigned, sold or transferred to an assignee and may be pledged or assigned as security by an electric utility or assignee to or for the benefit of a financing party. To the extent that an interest is assigned, sold or transferred or is pledged or assigned as security, the commission shall authorize the electric utility to contract with the assignee or financing party that the electric 20250SB1114PN1358 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility will continue to operate its system to provide service to its customers, will impose and collect the applicable intangible transition charges for the benefit and account of the assignee or financing party and will account for and remit the applicable intangible transition charge to or for the account of the assignee or financing party. If the qualified rate order so provides, the obligations of the electric utility:* * *(ii) shall be required by the commission to be undertaken and performed by the electric utility and any other entity which provides electric service to a person that was a customer of an electric utility located within the certificated territory of the electric utility on the effective date of this chapter or that became a customer of electric services within such territory after the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter and is still located within such territory, as a condition to the provision of service to such customer by such electric utility or other entity, unless the customer has paid a termination charge in the manner and on the basis specified in the qualified rate order.* * *(f) Actions with respect to intangible transition charges.--(1) Nothing in this chapter shall entitle any person to bring an action against a retail electric customer for nonpayment of intangible transition charges, other than the electric utility, its successor or any other entity which provides electric service to a person that was a customer of an electric utility located within the certificated territory 20250SB1114PN1358 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the electric utility on the effective date of this chapter or that became a customer of electric services within such territory after the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter and is still located within such territory.(2) The commission has exclusive jurisdiction over any dispute arising out of the obligations to impose and collect intangible transition charges of an electric utility, its successor or any other entity which provides electric service to a person that was a customer of an electric utility located within the certificated territory of the electric utility on the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter or that became a customer of electric services within such territory after the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter and is still located within such territory.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Assignee." An entity, including a corporation, public authority, trust or financing vehicle, to which an electric utility assigns, sells or transfers other than as security all or a portion of its interest in or right to intangible transition property. The term includes an entity, including a corporation, public authority, trust or financing vehicle to which a direct assignee of an electric utility may assign, sell or transfer other than as security its interest in or right to intangible transition property."Financing party." A holder of transition bonds, including trustees, collateral agents and other entities acting for the benefit of such a holder."Intangible transition charges." The amounts authorized to 20250SB1114PN1358 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be imposed on all customer bills and collected, through a nonbypassable mechanism by the electric utility or its successor or by any other entity which provides electric service to a person that was a customer of an electric utility located within the certificated territory of the electric utility on the effective date of this [chapter] subchapter or that, after this effective date of this [chapter] subchapter, became a customer of electric services within such territory and is still located within such territory, to recover qualified transition expenses pursuant to a qualified rate order. The amounts shall be allocated to customer classes in a manner that does not shift interclass or intraclass costs and maintains consistency with the allocation methodology for utility production plant accepted by the commission in the electric utility's most recent base rate proceeding."Intangible transition property."(1) The property right created under this section representing the irrevocable right of the electric utility or an assignee to receive through intangible transition charges amounts sufficient to recover all of its qualified transition expenses. The term includes all right, title and interest of the electric utility or assignee in the qualified rate order and in all revenues, collections, claims, payments, money or proceeds of or arising from intangible transition charges pursuant to the order to the extent that, in accordance with this [chapter] subchapter, the order and the rates and other charges authorized under the order are declared to be irrevocable.(2) Intangible transition property shall arise and exist only when, as and to the extent that an electric utility or 20250SB1114PN1358 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assignee has qualified transition expenses for which intangible transition charges are authorized in a qualified rate order that has become effective in accordance with subsection (a) and shall thereafter continuously exist to the extent provided in the order."Qualified rate order." An order of the commission adopted in accordance with this section, authorizing the imposition and collection of intangible transition charges."Qualified transition expenses." The transition or stranded costs of an electric utility approved by the commission for recovery under sections 2804 (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry) and 2808 (relating to competitive transition charge) through the issuance of transition bonds; the costs of retiring existing debt or equity capital of the electric utility or its holding company parent, including accrued interest and acquisition or redemption premium, costs of defeasance, and other related fees, costs and charges relating to, through the issuance of transition bonds or the assignment, sale or other transfer of intangible transition property; and the costs incurred to issue, service or refinance the transition bonds, including accrued interest and acquisition or redemption premium, and other related fees, costs and charges, or to assign, sell or otherwise transfer intangible transition property."Transition bonds." Bonds, debentures, notes, certificates of participation or of beneficial interest or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership which:(1) are issued by or on behalf of the electric utility or assignee pursuant to a qualified rate order;(2) are secured by or payable from intangible transition 20250SB1114PN1358 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property; and(3) reach final maturity in no longer than ten years.Section 4. Chapter 28 of Title 66 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER BLARGE LOAD CUSTOMERSSec.2821. Short title of subchapter.2822. Scope of subchapter.2823. Definitions.2824. Classification of service.2825. Tariffs.2826. Contracts.2826.1. Emergency Load Shedding Procedures.2826.2. Obligation to serve.2827. Annual reports.2828. Regulations and orders.2829. Additional ratepayer protections.§ 2821. Short title of subchapter.This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Ratepayer Protection Act.§ 2822. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter shall provide for a separate and distinct classification of service for retail electric customers that are large load customers and a regulatory framework to govern public utility service to large load customers.§ 2823. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250SB1114PN1358 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Electric distribution company." As defined in section 2803 (relating to definitions)."Facility." Includes all buildings, equipment, structures and other stationary items that are located on a single site or on contiguous or adjacent sites and that are owned or operated by the same person or by any person who controls, is controlled by or is under common control with such person. "Large load customer."( 1 ) A retail electric customer that has an aggregate monthly maximum demand of either of the following minimum thresholds:(i) for electric distribution companies whose peak load is equal to or above 2,500 megawatts, 20 megawatts or more; or(ii) for electric distribution companies whose peak load is less than 2,500 megawatts, 1 megawatt or more. (2) For purposes of calculating the aggregate minimum thresholds under this definition, the sum of all load of the retail electric customer's affiliated companies and companies with common ownership shall be included in the calculation. If there are multiple facilities at a single location of less than the applicable minimum thresholds, but the aggregate total load is greater than the minimum thresholds, all of those facilities shall be included in the calculation. "Retail electric customers." As defined in section 2803."Universal Service and Energy Conservation." As defined in section 2803.§ 2824. Classification of service.The commission shall provide for a classification of service for retail electric customers that are large load customers. The 20250SB1114PN1358 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 classification of service shall be separate and distinct from classifications for other commercial or industrial customers and require a separate tariff.§ 2825. Tariffs.(a) Tariff requirements.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall adopt an order establishing a model tariff for large load customers that must:(1) Do one of the following:(i) allocate the costs of serving the class of large load customers to the class in a manner that is equal to the costs of serving the class , including all direct and indirect customer costs associated with providing service to large load customers; or(ii) directly assign the costs of serving a large load customer to the large load customer.(2) Meet the same conditions the commission requires for a contract under section 2826(b)(1) (relating to contracts). (3) Mitigate the risk of: (i) other classes of retail electric customers paying costs associated with providing service to large load customers where the costs do not benefit other classes of customers; and(ii) shifting the costs of serving a large load customer to other classes of retail electric customers, including costs of an electric distribution company to meet load requirements resulting from the provision of electric service to a large load customer.(4) Include the following commercial terms and conditions for service:(i) Minimum contract terms to ensure that in the 20250SB1114PN1358 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 event the large load ceases operations prior to the end of the contract term the large load must take a minimum level of service to generate expected revenues that will protect other customers.(ii) Calculations of contribution in aid of construction for distribution infrastructure required from the large load, which must be consistent, transparent and equitably applied as determined by the commission.(iii) Security deposit or other financial security required from the large load, which must be consistent, transparent and equitably applied as determined by the commission.(iv) Load ramping schedules to ensure infrastructure adequacy.(v) Exit or early termination fees. (vi) Measures to prevent circumvention of the large load threshold through multiple facilities, interconnection points or metering points.(5) Provide for the electric distribution company's recovery of costs incurred in connection with the development and implementation of Universal Service and Energy Conservation programs consistent with the requirements for those programs under the following provisions through a tariff rate approved to recover the costs from ratepayers:(i) Section 2203(6), (7), (8), (9) and (10) (relating to standards for restructuring of natural gas utility industry).(ii) Section 2804(8) and (9) (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry).20250SB1114PN1358 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Include any other information required by the commission.(b) Submission.--Within 180 days of the commission's adoption of the model tariff under subsection (a), an electric distribution company shall file a proposed tariff that complies with the model tariff adopted under subsection (a) in such manner as the commission prescribes.(c) Review of proposed tariff.--The commission shall, after notice and opportunity to be heard, approve, modify or reject the proposed tariff by a final order entered no later than 12 months following the filing date of the electric distribution company's proposed tariff. The following shall apply:(1) In determining whether to approve, modify or reject a proposed tariff, the commission shall consider whether the tariff:(i) r esults in, or has the potential to result in, rates that include increased costs or other risks to other retail electric customers in connection with serving the large load customer class;(ii) p rovides for equitable contributions in rates to grid efficiency, reliability and resiliency benefits;(iii) i mpedes the electric distribution company's ability to meet the energy or alternative energy portfolio standards required under the act of November 30, 2004 (P.L.1672, No.213), known as the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, for default service customers, or reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases consistent with State policy;(iv) allows for procurement of, or contracts for, 20250SB1114PN1358 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 generation resources that support the electric distribution company's ability to meet the energy or alternative energy portfolio standards required under the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act for default service customers, or reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases consistent with State policy; and (v) meets any other conditions required by the commission.(2) The commission shall review all rates to ensure that the costs of providing service to the large load customer class are not subsidized by any other customer class.(d) Applicability.--If the commission rejects the proposed tariff filed by the electric distribution company for the classification of service, the commission shall direct further proceedings within the same formal record and the electric distribution company shall propose a conforming tariff for subsequent approval.(e) Determination of compliance with act.-- Providing electric generation service to a large load customer shall not be considered force majeure under the Alternative Energy Portfolio Standards Act, for the purposes of determining whether an electric distribution company or electric generation supplier has complied with the requirements of that act and has made a good faith effort to acquire sufficient alternative energy to comply with their obligations.(f) Regulations.--Within one year from the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall issue a notice of proposed rulemaking for the purpose of establishing regulations regarding the implementation of this subchapter to take effect by January 2, 2028.20250SB1114PN1358 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 2826. Contracts.(a) General rule.--At a time and manner established by the commission, the commission shall require an electric distribution company that is providing electric service to a large load customer to enter into a contract with the large load customer that covers the provision of the electric distribution service.(b) Contract requirements.--A contract for the provision of electric service between an electr ic distribution company and a large load customer shall comply with all of the following. The contract shall:(1) be consistent with the criteria listed under section 2825(c) (relating to tariffs);(2) specify the duration of the contract, which may be for no less than 20 years;(3) require the large load customer to notify the electr ic distribution company in writing, within five years of the expiration date of the current contract, of the large load customer's intent to renew or not renew the contract for an additional 20-year period;(4) specify the date or estimated date that the electric distribution company will begin to provide electric service to the large load customer;(5) obligate the large load customer to pay a minimum amount or percentage as determined by the commission, based on the customer's projected electric usage for the electric services the electric distribution company is contracted to provide for the duration of the contract;(6) contain commercial terms and conditions consistent with section 2825(a)(4)(i), (ii), (iii) and (vi); and20250SB1114PN1358 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) meet any other conditions required by the commission.(c) D elay.--If an electric distribution company fails to provide electric service on or by the date or estimated date specified in a contract entered into under this section due to causes within the electric distribution company's reasonable control, the electric distribution company shall provide the large load customer notice of delay as soon as reasonably practicable. A contract entered into under this section may include terms and conditions that address the possibility of a delay due to causes within the reasonable control of the parties to the contract.(d) Void contract provisions.--Any provision of a contract described in this section shall be void and unenforceable if the provision has the purpose and effect of either:(1) preventing the commission from carrying out the commission's duties under this subchapter; or (2) preventing or restricting the disclosure of any terms of the contract.(e) Applicability.--This section applies to large load customers that enter into a contract for electric service with an electric distribution company:(1) on or after the effective date of this subsection; and(2) before the effective date of this subsection, if the provision of electric service requires the electric distribution company to make significant investments or incur costs after the effective date of this subsection that could result in increased costs or risks to other retail electric customers of the electric distribution company. 20250SB1114PN1358 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Statutory advocates. -- A public utility shall provide a copy of a contract filed under this section to the Office of Consumer Advocate, Office of Small Business Advocate and Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement subject to appropriate confidentiality protective agreements or orders.§ 2826.1. Emergency load shedding procedures.(a) Oversight of emergency load shedding procedures.-- Consistent with the commission's existing authority under sections 501 (relating to general powers) and 1501 (relating to character of service and facilities), the commission shall have the authority to review, direct modifications and approve the emergency retail load shedding procedures and plans of electric distribution companies that are used to comply with a regional transmission organization-determined manual load shedding in emergency conditions.(b) Regulations during emergency conditions.-- The commission shall promulgate temporary and final regulations relating to all of the following during emergency conditions:(1) Ensuring compliance by the electric distribution company with the load shedding allocations assigned by the regional transmission organization in which the electric distribution company is a member.(2) Designating critical load within the electric distribution company's service area and requiring curtailment of noncritical load prior to curtailment of critical load.(3) Requiring curtailment of noncritical load attributable to large loads prior to and to the extent of preventing the curtailment of noncritical load attributable to residential, commercial and industrial customers.(4) After curtailments of noncritical load attributable 20250SB1114PN1358 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to large loads are performed, if additional curtailments are necessary, requiring each electric distribution company to perform rotating curtailments among residential, commercial and industrial customers.(5) Ensuring that the electric distribution company can isolate and curtail large loads without affecting service to other customers.§ 2826.2. Obligation to serve.The commission shall promulgate temporary and final regulations relating to conditions under which new large load is permitted to interconnect to the electric distribution system as new retail load while ensuring the electric distribution company's continued provision of electric public utility service to existing customers that is adequate, reasonable, reasonably continuous, without unreasonable interruptions or delay and reliable.§ 2827. Annual reports.No later than September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the members of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate, the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives, the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate, the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives and the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall review the trends in load requirements and other implications from large load customers and other retail electric customers that use large amounts of electric. In providing the report, the commission shall protect proprietary information as provided for under rules, regulations or orders of the 20250SB1114PN1358 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission.§ 2828. Regulations and orders. The commission is authorized to prescribe rules and regulations necessary to effectuate this subchapter and issue orders as it deems necessary to administer and enforce this subchapter.§ 2829. Additional ratepayer protections.Any provision of any contract, agreement or similar instrument entered into between a large load customer and another party on or after the effective date of this section shall be void and unenforceable if the provision has the purpose or effect of preventing or restricting the disclosure of any of the terms, or factual information related to the purpose, of the contract, agreement or similar instrument. Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1114PN1358 - 40 - 123456789101112131415